Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to local units of government, federally recognized Tribal entities, and state agencies participating in the statewide Allied Radio Matrix for Emergency Response (Previous ARMER Next) public safety radio communication system established under Minnesota Statutes, section 403.36, subdivision 1e. The grants must be used to purchase or upgrade portable radios, mobile radios, and related equipment that is interoperable with the Previous ARMER Next system. Each local government unit may receive only one grant. The grant is contingent upon a match of at least five percent from nonstate funds. Of the grant amounts, 33 percent must be distributed to local units of government within the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. The director of the Department of Public Safety Emergency Communication Networks division must administer the grant program with the Statewide Emergency Communications Board approving the grant allocation methodology. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end